Massachusetts, session 194th, H136.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 128 of the General Laws , as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, shall be amended by inserting after section 65A the following new section:-

Section 65B. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following words will have the
following meanings:
''Sludge'', any solid, semisolid or liquid waste generated from a municipal, commercial or
industrial wastewater treatment plant, water supply treatment plant, or air pollution control
facility or any other such waste having similar characteristics and effects.
(b). Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, except as provided in
subsection (c), a person may not:
of 3

(1) Apply to or spread on any land in the State:
(i) Sludge generated from a municipal, commercial or industrial wastewater treatment
plant;
(ii) Compost material that included in its production sludge generated from a municipal,
commercial or industrial wastewater treatment plant or septage; or
(iii) Any other product or material that is intended for use as a fertilizer, soil amendment,
topsoil replacement or mulch or for other similar agricultural purpose that is derived from or
contains sludge generated from a municipal, commercial or industrial wastewater treatment plant
or septage; or
(2) Sell or distribute in the State:
(i) Compost material that included in its production sludge generated from a municipal,
commercial or industrial wastewater treatment plant or septage; or
(ii) Any other product or material that is intended for use as a fertilizer, soil amendment,
topsoil replacement or mulch or for other similar agricultural purpose that is derived from or
contains sludge generated from a municipal, commercial or industrial wastewater treatment plant
or septage.
(c) The prohibitions in subsection (b) do not apply to:
(1) The disposal or placement at a solid waste landfill of any of the materials that are
prohibited from application, spreading, sale or distribution by this subsection;
of 3

(2) The land application of or the sale or distribution of compost material or other
agricultural product or material derived from or containing residuals generated as a result of the
processing or cultivation of food, food waste, crops or vegetative material, the brewing of malt
liquor, the fermenting of wine or hard cider or the distilling of spirits, including, but not limited
to, blueberries, apples, grapes, potatoes, seaweed, fish and seafood and spent grain or malt,
provided that such residuals are not mixed with sludge from a municipal, commercial or
industrial wastewater treatment plant, septage, sewage or sanitary wastewater prior to or during
land application or the production of the compost material or other agricultural product or
material; or
(3) The land application of or the sale or distribution of compost material or other
agricultural product or material derived from or containing sludge resulting from the production
of precipitated calcium carbonate.
(4) The land application of or sale any of the materials that are prohibited from
application, spreading, sale or distribution by this subsection including Materials derived from a
composting toilet system defined by 310 CMR 15.289.
of 3